Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.830

Agritourism—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agritourism activity" means any activity carried out on a farm or ranch whose primary business activity is agriculture or ranching and that allows members of the general public, for recreational, entertainment, or educational purposes, to view or enjoy rural activities including, but not limited to: Farming; ranching; historic, cultural, and on-site educational programs; recreational farming programs that may include on-site hospitality services; guided and self-guided tours; petting zoos; farm festivals; corn mazes; harvest-your-own operations; hayrides; barn parties; horseback riding; fishing; and camping.

(2) "Agritourism professional" means any person in the business of providing one or more agritourism activities, whether or not for compensation.

(3) "Inherent risks of agritourism activity" means those dangers or conditions that are an integral part of an agritourism activity including certain hazards, such as surface and subsurface conditions, natural conditions of land, vegetation, waters, the behavior of wild or domestic animals, and ordinary dangers of structures or equipment ordinarily used in farming and ranching operations. Inherent risks of agritourism activity also include the potential of a participant to act in a negligent manner that may contribute to injury to the participant or others, including failing to follow instructions given by the agritourism professional or failing to exercise reasonable caution while engaging in the agritourism activity, unless the participant acting in a negligent manner is a minor or is under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

(4) "Participant" means any person, other than the agritourism professional, who engages in an agritourism activity.

(5) "Person" means an individual, fiduciary, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, unit of government, or any other group acting as a unit.

[ 2017 c 227 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2017 c 227: See note following RCW 4.24.832.